District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.93

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this subchapter, no person shall use the words or terms “electrician,” “licensed electrician,” “master electrician,” or any words describing an electrician specialty authorized by the Board that imply that the person is authorized to perform the services of an electrician in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.93.